Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.525

Regents and trustees—Travel expenses.

Each member of a board of regents or board of trustees of a university or other state institution of higher education, shall be entitled to receive travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060 as now existing or hereafter amended for each day or portion thereof in which he or she is actually engaged in business of the board.

[ 1979 c 14 s 2. Prior: 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 23; 1977 ex.s. c 118 s 1; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34 s 72; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.525; prior: (i) 1939 c 176 s 1, part; 1927 c 227 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 240 s 5, part; RRS s 4557, part. Formerly RCW 28.77.130, part. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 249 s 14; RRS s 4594; prior: 1897 c 118 s 203; 1891 c 145 s 15. Formerly RCW 28.80.150.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Effective date—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 34: See notes following RCW 2.08.115.